Florida, session 2026, SB844.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 12 456.0301, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 456.0301âRequirement for instruction on controlled 14 substance prescribing.â 15 (1)(a)âThe appropriate board shall require each person 16 registered with the United States Drug Enforcement 17 Administration and authorized to prescribe controlled substances 18 pursuant to 21 U.S.C. s. 822 to complete a board-approved 2-hour 19 continuing education course on prescribing controlled substances 20 offered by a statewide professional association of physicians in 21 this state that is accredited to provide educational activities 22 designated for the American Medical Association Physicianâs 23 Recognition Award Category 1 Credit or the American Osteopathic 24 Category 1-A continuing medical education credit as part of 25 biennial license renewal. The course must include information on 26 the current standards for prescribing controlled substances, 27 particularly opiates; alternatives to these standards; 28 nonpharmacological therapies; prescribing emergency opioid 29 antagonists; and the risks of opioid addiction following all 30 stages of treatment in the management of acute pain; and the 31 treatment of pain for patients with sickle cell disease. The 32 course may be offered in a distance learning format and must be 33 included within the number of continuing education hours 34 required by law. The department may not renew the license of any 35 prescriber registered with the United States Drug Enforcement 36 Administration to prescribe controlled substances who has failed 37 to complete the course. The course must be completed by January 38 31, 2019, and at each subsequent renewal. This paragraph does 39 not apply to a licensee who is required by his or her applicable 40 practice act to complete a minimum of 2 hours of continuing 41 education on the safe and effective prescribing of controlled 42 substances. 43 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.